District of Columbia statutes.
9-203.09

Official street map; periodic publication; contents; availability.

(a)

Within 2 years of May 10, 1988, and every 5 years thereafter, the Mayor shall publish an official street map that delineates each street and property square in the District of Columbia.

(b)

This map shall distinguish between:

(1)

Streets that have been improved, constructed, or paved;

(2)

Streets that have been acquired but have not been improved, constructed, or paved; and

(3)

Streets that are on the highway plan but have not been acquired and have not been improved, constructed, or paved.

(c)

This map shall be available for review in every public library in the District and be available for sale by the District of Columbia Office of Documents.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 309
as added May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-106, § 2(a), 35 DCR 2170

Cross References

Council of the District of Columbia, power to name and rename highways, buildings, public places, and property, see § 1-301.01.
Streets, make a difference foundation, authorization to install granite markers in sidewalks, see § 9-1215.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-449.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-106, “New Street or Alley Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 88-162, July 11, 1988.